apertium-tt-ba.ba.lexc
Multichar_Symbols 

%<n%>              ! Имя существительное 
%<prn%>            ! Местоимение
%<adv%>            ! Наречие
%<det%>            ! 
%<num%>            ! Число
%<v%>              ! Глагол
%<vaux%>           ! 
%<np%>             ! Имя собственное
%<adj%>            ! Прилагательное
%<post%>           ! Послелог
%<postadv%>        ! Посленаречие
%<cnjcoo%>         ! Союз
%<cnjadv%>         ! Союз
%<abbr%>           ! Аббревиатура

%<part%>           ! Частица
%<pred%>           ! 
%<qst%>            ! 

%<pers%>           ! 
%<ref%>            ! 
%<ind%>            ! 
%<itg%>            ! 
%<dem%>            ! 
%<qnt%>            ! 
%<px%>           ! 
%<attr%>           ! 
%<subst%>          ! 
%<advl%>          ! 
%<locattr%>        ! 

%<pass%>           ! 
%<caus%>           ! 
%<neg%>            ! 
%<coop%>           ! 

%<comp%>           ! 
%<ord%>            ! 
%<sim%>            ! 

%<top%>            ! 
%<ant%>            ! 
%<cog%>            ! 

%<iv%>             !
%<tv%>             !

%<m%>              !
%<f%>              !
%<mf%>              !

%<p1%>             !
%<p2%>             !
%<p3%>             !

%<px1sg%>          !
%<px2sg%>          !
%<px3sp%>          !
%<px1pl%>          !
%<px2pl%>          !


%<sg%>             ! Единственное число
%<pl%>             ! Множественное число

%<nom%>            ! Именительный
%<gen%>            ! Родительный
%<dat%>            ! Дательный
%<acc%>            ! Винительый
%<loc%>            ! 
%<abl%>            ! 

%<pres%>           ! -{A}
%<past%>           ! -{G}{A}н
%<fut%>            ! -{I}р
%<ifi%>            ! -{N}{I}
%<imp%>            !

%<ger1%>           ! -м{A}{K}
%<ger2%>           ! -{I}п
%<ger3%>           ! -{G}{A}с
%<ger4%>           ! -{G}{A}нс{I}
%<ger5%>           ! -{G}{A}н
%<ger6%>           ! -{I}р
%<ger7%>           ! -{A}с{A}{K}
%<ger8%>           ! -{E}h
%<cond%>           ! -h{A}
%<vol%>            ! -{G}{I}
%<inf%>            ! Infinitive !  ! Инфинитив ! -{I}рг{A}

%<sent%>           ! Sentence marker
%<guio%>           ! Hyphen
%<cm%>             ! Comma
%<apos%>           ! Apostrophe
%<rquot%>          ! Quote marker (right hand side) 
%<lquot%>          ! Quote marker (left hand side) 
%<rpar%>           ! Parenthetical marker (right hand side) 
%<lpar%>           ! Parenthetical marker (left hand side) 


%{L%}              ! 
%{N%}              ! 
%{G%}              ! 
%{K%}              ! 
%{I%}              ! 
%{A%}              ! 
%{E%}              ! 
%{U%}              ! 

%{h%}              ! 
%{n%}              ! 
%{l%}              ! 

%>                 !

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                       M O R P H O T A C T I C S                         !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Root

Conjunctions ; 
Postpositions ; 
Postadverbs ; 
Pronouns ; 
Determiners ; 
Numerals ; 
Nouns ; 
ProperNouns ; 
Adjectives ; 
Adverbs ; 
Verbs ; 
Abbreviations ; 
Punctuation ; 

LEXICON CLIT

%+да%<cnjcoo%>:% %{D%}%{A%} # ;
%+мы%<qst%>:%>м%{I%} # ;
%+лыр%<part%>:%>%{L%}%{I%}р # ;
%+сы%<part%>:%>с%{I%} # ;
!%+мы% ни%<qst%>:%>м%{I%}% ни # ;
!%+уҡ%<part%>:% %{U%}%{K%} # ;
# ;

LEXICON CASE

%<nom%>: CLIT ;
%<gen%>:%>%{N%}%{I%}ң CLIT ;
%<dat%>:%>%{G%}%{A%} CLIT ;
%<acc%>:%>%{N%}%{I%} CLIT ;
%<loc%>:%>%{L%}%{A%} CLIT ;
%<abl%>:%>%{N%}%{A%}н CLIT ;
%<loc%>%<attr%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}%{G%}%{I%} CLIT ;


LEXICON POSS-REAL

%<px1sg%>:%>%{I%}м CASE ;
%<px2sg%>:%>%{I%}ң CASE ;
%<px3sp%>:%>%{h%}%{I%}%{n%} CASE ;
%<px1pl%>:%>%{I%}б%{I%}ҙ CASE ;
%<px2pl%>:%>%{I%}%{G%}%{I%}ҙ CASE ;

CASE ; 

LEXICON POSS

%<px%>:%>%{L%}%{I%}%{K%}%{I%}{n} CASE ;

POSS-REAL ; 


LEXICON SUBST

%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р POSS ;
POSS ;

LEXICON NLEX

%<n%>%<attr%>: # ;
%<n%>: SUBST ;

LEXICON DIGITLEX

%<num%>: # ; 

LEXICON NUMLEX

%<num%>: # ;
%<num%>%<subst%>: SUBST ;
%<num%>%<ord%>:%>%{I%}нч%{I%} SUBST ;
%<num%>%<sim%>:%>%{A%}р SUBST ;

LEXICON NPCOGMLEX

%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>: CASE ;

LEXICON NPCOGFLEX

%<np%>%<cog%>%<f%>: CASE ;

LEXICON NPCOGMFLEX

%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>: CASE ;

LEXICON NPANTMLEX

%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>: CASE ; 

LEXICON NPANTFLEX

%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>: CASE ; 

LEXICON NPTOPLEX

%<np%>%<top%>: CASE ; 

LEXICON ALEX

%<adj%>: # ; 
%<adj%>%<subst%>: SUBST ; 
%<adj%>%<comp%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}%{K%} # ; 
%<adj%>%<advl%>: CLIT ; 

LEXICON V-PERS-S1 

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}м CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>%{h%}%{I%}ң CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%> CLIT ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>б%{I%}ҙ CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{h%}%{I%}г%{I%}ҙ CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CLIT ;

LEXICON V-PERS-S2

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>ң CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%> CLIT ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>ҡ CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>г%{I%}ҙ CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CLIT ;

LEXICON V-PERS-S3-NO1SG

%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>%{h%}%{I%}ң CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%> CLIT ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>б%{I%}ҙ CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{h%}%{I%}г%{I%}ҙ CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CLIT ;

LEXICON V-PERS-S3

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м%{I%}н CLIT ;

V-PERS-S3-NO1SG ; 

LEXICON V-PERS-S4 ! Volition endings

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}м CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>%{h%}%{I%}ң CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>%{h%}%{I%}%{n%} CLIT ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>б%{I%}ҙ CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{h%}%{I%}г%{I%}ҙ CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CLIT ;

LEXICON V-FINITE-FORMS

%<pres%>:%>%{E%} V-PERS-S1 ; 
%<ifi%>:%>%{N%}%{I%} V-PERS-S2 ; 
%<past%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н V-PERS-S3 ; 

LEXICON V-NONFINITE-FORMS

%<ger1%>:%>м%{A%}%{K%} POSS ;
%<ger3%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}с POSS ;
%<ger4%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}нс%{I%} POSS ;
%<ger5%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н POSS ;
%<ger6%>:%>%{I%}р POSS ;
%<inf%>:%>%{I%}рг%{A%} POSS ;
%<ger7%>:%>%{A%}с%{A%}%{K%} POSS ;
%<ger8%>:%>%{E%}һ V-PERS-S4 ;
%<cond%>:%>һ%{A%} V-PERS-S2 ;
%<vol%>:%>%{G%}%{I%} V-PERS-S2 ;

!%<imp%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{A%}й%{I%}м CLIT ; ! jussive ^____^
%<imp%>%<p2%>%<sg%>: CLIT  ;
%<imp%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}г%{I%}ҙ CLIT ;

LEXICON V-COMMON-LEX

V-FINITE-FORMS ; 
V-NONFINITE-FORMS ;

LEXICON V-IRREG-LEX

%<ger2%>:%>%{I%}п POSS ;
%<fut%>:%>%{I%}р V-PERS-S3 ; 
%<neg%>%<fut%>:%>м%{A%}ҫ V-PERS-S3-NO1SG ; 
%<neg%>%<fut%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м%{A%}%>м CLIT ;
%<neg%>%<fut%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м%{A%}ҫ%>м%{I%}н CLIT ; ! Dir/LR

LEXICON V-NEG-LEX 

%<neg%>:%>м%{A%} V-COMMON-LEX ;
%<neg%>%<ger2%>:%>м%{A%}%>%{E%}%>с%{A%} POSS ;
V-COMMON-LEX ; 

LEXICON V-IV-LEX

%<v%>%<iv%>: V-COMMON-LEX ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-IRREG-LEX ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-NEG-LEX ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<neg%>:%>м%{A%} V-COMMON-LEX ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>:%>%{I%}т V-NEG-LEX ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>:%>%{I%}т V-IRREG-LEX ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<coop%>:%>%{I%}ш V-NEG-LEX ; 
%<v%>%<iv%>%<coop%>:%>%{I%}ш V-IRREG-LEX ;

LEXICON V-TV-LEX

%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON-LEX ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-IRREG-LEX ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-NEG-LEX ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>:%>м%{A%} V-COMMON-LEX ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{I%}%{l%} V-NEG-LEX ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{I%}%{l%} V-IRREG-LEX ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>:%>%{I%}т V-NEG-LEX ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>:%>%{I%}т V-IRREG-LEX ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<coop%>:%>%{I%}ш V-NEG-LEX ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>%<coop%>:%>%{I%}ш V-IRREG-LEX ;

LEXICON VAUX

%<vaux%>: V-PERS-S2 ;

LEXICON Nouns 
аусылыҡ:аусылыҡ NLEX ; ! ""
бәреү:бәреү NLEX ; ! ""
бысраҡ:бысраҡ NLEX ; ! ""
доктор:доктор NLEX ; ! ""
идея:идея NLEX ; ! ""
йәш:йәш NLEX ; ! ""
ҡарасай:ҡарасай NLEX ; ! ""
клуб:клуб NLEX ; ! ""
күпселек:күпселек NLEX ; ! ""
мәғлүмәт:мәғлүмәт NLEX ; ! ""
олатай:олатай NLEX ; ! ""
революция:революция NLEX ; ! ""
сит:сит NLEX ; ! ""
тема:тема NLEX ; ! ""
тубыҡ:тубыҡ NLEX ; ! ""
усаҡ:усаҡ NLEX ; ! ""
хат:хат NLEX ; ! ""
һулыш:һулыш NLEX ; ! ""
ысул:ысул NLEX ; ! ""
ярышсы:ярышсы NLEX ; ! ""
сәнәғәт:сәнәғәт NLEX ; ! ""
аръяҡ:аръяҡ NLEX ; ! ""
LEXICON ProperNouns
Башҡортостан:Башҡортостан NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
Пермь:Пермь NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
Петербур:Петербур NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
Алмания:Алмания NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
СССР:СССР NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
Европа:Европа NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
Америка:Америка NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
Санкт-Петербург:Санкт-Петербург NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
Ленинград:Ленинград NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
Дон:Дон NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
Афғанстан:Афғанстан NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
Герат:Герат NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
Новгород:Новгород NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
Силәбе:Силәбе NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
Урал:Урал NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
Чечня:Чечня NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
Ағиҙел:Ағиҙел NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
Алжир:Алжир NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
Байконур:Байконур NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
Баҡалы:Баҡалы NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
Башҡортостан:Башҡортостан NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
Благовар:Благовар NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
Гөлнара:Гөлнара NPANTFLEX ; ! ""
Ирина:Ирина NPANTFLEX ; ! ""
Лилиә:Лилиә NPANTFLEX ; ! ""
Айгөл:Айгөл NPANTFLEX ; ! ""
Айзирә:Айзирә NPANTFLEX ; ! ""
Алина:Алина NPANTFLEX ; ! ""
Алла:Алла NPANTFLEX ; ! ""
Альбина:Альбина NPANTFLEX ; ! ""
Анна:Анна NPANTFLEX ; ! ""
Артур:Артур NPANTMLEX ; ! ""
Әбйәлил:Әбйәлил NPANTMLEX ; ! ""
Виктор:Виктор NPANTMLEX ; ! ""
Владимир:Владимир NPANTMLEX ; ! ""
Ғәйнетдин:Ғәйнетдин NPANTMLEX ; ! ""
Евгений:Евгений NPANTMLEX ; ! ""
Илмир:Илмир NPANTMLEX ; ! ""
Кирилл:Кирилл NPANTMLEX ; ! ""
Константин:Константин NPANTMLEX ; ! ""
Марат:Марат NPANTMLEX ; ! ""
Михаил:Михаил NPANTMLEX ; ! ""
Николай:Николай NPANTMLEX ; ! ""
Рауил:Рауил NPANTMLEX ; ! ""
Рәмил:Рәмил NPANTMLEX ; ! ""
Салауат:Салауат NPANTMLEX ; ! ""
Тимур:Тимур NPANTMLEX ; ! ""
Азамат:Азамат NPANTMLEX ; ! ""
Айнур:Айнур NPANTMLEX ; ! ""
Александр:Александр NPANTMLEX ; ! ""
Альберт:Альберт NPANTMLEX ; ! ""
Андрей:Андрей NPANTMLEX ; ! ""
Борис:Борис NPANTMLEX ; ! ""
Әхмәтов:Әхмәтов NPCOGMLEX ; ! ""
Балабанов:Балабанов NPCOGMLEX ; ! ""
Зубков:Зубков NPCOGMLEX ; ! ""
Исхаҡов:Исхаҡов NPCOGMLEX ; ! ""
Маврин:Маврин NPCOGMLEX ; ! ""
Нәбиуллин:Нәбиуллин NPCOGMLEX ; ! ""
Путин:Путин NPCOGMLEX ; ! ""
Рәжәпов:Рәжәпов NPCOGMLEX ; ! ""
Сәфиуллин:Сәфиуллин NPCOGMLEX ; ! ""
Тазиев:Тазиев NPCOGMLEX ; ! ""
Толкачев:Толкачев NPCOGMLEX ; ! ""
Тупиков:Тупиков NPCOGMLEX ; ! ""
Хәмитов:Хәмитов NPCOGMLEX ; ! ""
Хәсәнов:Хәсәнов NPCOGMLEX ; ! ""
Афонин:Афонин NPCOGMLEX ; ! ""
Әсәҙуллин:Әсәҙуллин NPCOGMLEX ; ! ""
Башаров:Башаров NPCOGMLEX ; ! ""
Әүбәкирова:Әүбәкирова NPCOGFLEX ; ! ""
Байкова:Байкова NPCOGFLEX ; ! ""
Баталова:Баталова NPCOGFLEX ; ! ""
Башкортова:Башкортова NPCOGFLEX ; ! ""
Биишева:Биишева NPCOGFLEX ; ! ""
Бабич:Бабич NPCOGMFLEX ; ! ""
Орджоникидзе:Орджоникидзе NPCOGMFLEX ; ! ""
Семивеличенко:Семивеличенко NPCOGMFLEX ; ! ""
LEXICON Adjectives
аҙаҡҡы:аҙаҡҡы ALEX ; ! ""
бөйөк:бөйөк ALEX ; ! ""
йыуан:йыуан ALEX ; ! ""
көслө:көслө ALEX ; ! ""
танылған:танылған ALEX ; ! ""
уҙған:уҙған ALEX ; ! ""
ят:ят ALEX ; ! ""
ҡыҫҡа:ҡыҫҡа ALEX ; ! ""
йоҡа:йоҡа ALEX ; ! ""
әйбәт:әйбәт ALEX ; ! ""
шат:шат ALEX ; ! ""
тыныч:тыныч ALEX ; ! ""
хайуандарса:хайуандарса ALEX ; ! ""
яланғас:яланғас ALEX ; ! ""
ҡатлаулы:ҡатлаулы ALEX ; ! ""
алынған:алынған ALEX ; ! ""
юғары:юғары ALEX ; ! ""
йорт:йорт ALEX ; ! ""
үлек:үлек ALEX ; ! ""
ҙур% ғына:ҙур% ғына ALEX ; ! ""
башҡарма:башҡарма ALEX ; ! ""
унитар:унитар ALEX ; ! ""
аналитик:аналитик ALEX ; ! ""
LEXICON Verbs 
йоҡла:йоҡла V-IV-LEX ; ! ""
ярат:ярат V-TV-LEX ; ! ""
эшлә:эшлә V-TV-LEX ; ! ""
дауам% ит:дауам% ит V-TV-LEX ; ! ""
сис:сис V-TV-LEX ; ! ""
тап:тап V-TV-LEX ; ! ""
ат:ат V-TV-LEX ; ! ""
ҡарар% ит:ҡарар% ит V-TV-LEX ; ! ""
онот:онот V-TV-LEX ; ! ""
ал:ал V-TV-LEX ; ! ""
төшөндөр:төшөндөр V-TV-LEX ; ! ""
иҫкә% төшөр:иҫкә% төшөр V-TV-LEX ; ! ""
йәшә:йәшә V-IV-LEX ; ! ""
кит:кит V-IV-LEX ; ! ""
хеҙмәт% ит:хеҙмәт% ит V-IV-LEX ; ! ""
бул:бул V-IV-LEX ; ! ""
ин:ин V-IV-LEX ; ! ""
мен:мен V-IV-LEX ; ! ""
йылмай:йылмай V-IV-LEX ; ! ""
ышан:ышан V-IV-LEX ; ! ""
ғәжәплән:ғәжәплән V-IV-LEX ; ! ""
бүл:бүл V-TV-LEX ; ! ""
индер:индер V-TV-LEX ; ! ""
яҡла:яҡла V-TV-LEX ; ! ""
булдыр:булдыр V-TV-LEX ; ! ""
уҡы:уҡы V-TV-LEX ; ! ""
ашыр:ашыр V-TV-LEX ; ! ""
ныгыт:ныгыт V-TV-LEX ; ! ""
формалаштыр:формалаштыр V-TV-LEX ; ! ""
багышла:багышла V-TV-LEX ; ! ""
финансла:финансла V-TV-LEX ; ! ""
белдер:белдер V-TV-LEX ; ! ""
ашы:ашы V-IV-LEX ; ! ""
саҡырыл:саҡырыл V-IV-LEX ; ! ""
баҫыл:баҫыл V-IV-LEX ; ! ""
бәйлән:бәйлән V-IV-LEX ; ! ""
киңәйтел:киңәйтел V-IV-LEX ; ! ""
баһалан:баһалан V-IV-LEX ; ! ""
бирел:бирел V-IV-LEX ; ! ""
алмаш:алмаш V-IV-LEX ; ! ""
башкарыл:башкарыл V-IV-LEX ; ! ""
исәплән:исәплән V-IV-LEX ; ! ""
алыш:алыш V-IV-LEX ; ! ""
билгелән:билгелән V-IV-LEX ; ! ""
